apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="চেক /কাট__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftcnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কেটো</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কেটোনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটিস</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটিসনে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেন</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেননা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেন</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেননা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftimp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটব</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবি</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবিনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেন</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেননা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেনা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেন</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটবেননা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটা</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটতে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটার</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>না</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf2"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কেটেছিল</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটেনি</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কেটেছিলাম</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটিনি</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কেটেছিলে</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটনি</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কেটেছিলি</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটিসনি</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কেটেছিলেন</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কাটেননি</l>
          <r>কাট<s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="neg"/></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="টুকরো টুকরো করে কাট"><i>টুকরো টুকরো করে </i><par n="চেক /কাট__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="চেক কাট"><i>চেক </i><par n="চেক /কাট__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="চিমটি কাট"><i>চিমটি </i><par n="চেক /কাট__vblex"/></e>
